California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 welfare services, adult protective services, and community-based organizations and other agencies working in Alameda County in order to increase the effectiveness of prevention, early intervention, and prosecution of domestic and family violence.

(b) The City Council of the City of Berkeley shall direct the local registrar to deposit fees collected pursuant to Section 103627 of the Health and Safety Code into a special fund. The city may retain up to 4 percent of the fund for administrative costs associated with the collection and segregation of the additional fees and the deposit of these fees into the special fund. Proceeds from the fund shall be used for governmental oversight and coordination of domestic violence and family violence prevention and intervention efforts, including law enforcement, mental health, public health, substance abuse, victim advocacy, community education, and housing, in order to increase the effectiveness of
 prevention, early intervention, and prosecution of domestic and family violence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 215, Sec. 6.   (AB 73)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

18309.5.

The Solano County Board of Supervisors shall direct the local registrar, county recorder, and county clerk to deposit fees collected pursuant to Section 26840.11 of the Government Code and Section 103628 of the Health and Safety Code into a special fund.

The county may retain up to 4 percent of the fund for administrative costs associated with the collection and segregation of the additional fees and the deposit of these fees into the special fund. Proceeds from the fund shall be used for governmental oversight and coordination of domestic violence and family violence prevention, intervention, and prosecution efforts among the court system, the district attorney’s office, the public defender’s office, law enforcement, the probation department, mental health,
 substance abuse, child welfare services, adult protective services, and community-based organizations and other agencies working in Solano County in order to increase the effectiveness of prevention, early intervention, and prosecution of domestic and family violence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 120, Sec. 3.   (SB 154)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Green Light-Green Thumb Programs [18310. - 18312.]

18310.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish the Green Light-Green Thumb programs for the benefit of senior citizens in California, as funded under the mainstream program of the Economic Opportunity Act of 1965, as amended, and as administered by the United States Department of Labor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1074.)
-------------------------------------------

18311.

Funds received pursuant to this chapter shall be administered by the California Commission on Aging, and such commission shall provide any planning necessary to implement the programs established under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1074.)
-------------------------------------------

18312.

The state shall supply the necessary in-kind equipment and materials for projects under which the Green Light-Green Thumb programs contract with a department or agency of the state. In projects under which the Green Light-Green Thumb programs contract directly with local government entities, such local governmental entities shall supply the necessary in-kind equipment and materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1074.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.7. Nutrition Program for the Elderly [18325. - 18335.]

18325.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the McCarthy-Kennick Nutrition Program for the Elderly Act of 1972.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------

18325.5.

It is the intention of the Legislature that the State of California through state, local governmental, and private agencies shall make a maximum contribution of their in-kind resources and in-kind facilities in order to implement this chapter under Title III of the Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended, provided however that should federal funds become available under Title VII of the Older Americans Act of 1965 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3021 et seq.), as amended, the Legislature intends that programs provided pursuant to this chapter be implemented to the maximum extent feasible under Title VII (former 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3045 et seq.) in order to secure the maximum federal financial participation. The Older Americans Act of 1965 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 et seq.), as amended, states that the federal government will share in the cost of approved programs and that the local or state share may be “in-kind” contributions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 717.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18326.

The California Commission on Aging, with the approval of the Secretary of California Health and Human Services, shall develop and submit to the federal government the state plan for implementation of the Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended, pursuant to this chapter. Such plan shall be submitted by February 1, 1973, and by May 1st of each succeeding year. While such state plan is in preparation, any private agency or public agency, with the consent of the jurisdiction involved, may submit to the California Commission on Aging for review and consideration its proposal for funding and assistance pursuant to the Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended. The commission shall do everything feasible to assist such private and state or local agencies in the preparation of
 their proposals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 67.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18327.

The state plan referred to in Section 18326 shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Establishment of projects that, five or more days per week, provide at least one meal per day, either served in an in-person setting, or provided for to-go pickup to be consumed in a virtual congregate setting by eligible individuals, and any additional meals the contracting agency or organization may elect to provide.

(b) Provision of nutrition projects for individuals 60 years of age or older who are eligible.

(c) Furnishing of sites for nutrition projects in close proximity to concentrations of eligible individuals’
 residences, such as schools, churches, senior centers, and facilities serving older adults.

(d) Utilization of administrative methods to ensure maximum participation of eligible individuals.

(e) Provision of special menus, when feasible, to meet particular dietary needs arising from health or religious requirements or ethnic backgrounds.

(f) Provision of settings conducive to including, as a part of these projects, recreational activities, information, health and wellness counseling, and referral services.

(g) Provision of appropriate modes of transportation, when feasible, essential to maximum participation of eligible individuals confined to their homes.

(h) Establishment and
 administration of projects with the advice of persons competent in the field and of older Californians who will themselves participate in the program.

(i) Nutrition education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 302, Sec. 1.   (AB 1476)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18327.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state plan referred to in Section 18326 and Section 18327 shall provide that not less than 10 percent nor more than 20 percent of all funds expended for nutrition services shall be available for meals to individuals in their residences, except as otherwise required by federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1025.)
-------------------------------------------

18327.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, not more than 20 percent of the funds administered by the state for nutrition services for the elderly pursuant to this chapter shall be expended for meals delivered to individuals in their residences. Such individuals receiving meals served in their residences shall not be required to participate in congregate feeding programs, except as otherwise required by federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1025.)
-------------------------------------------

18327.3.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, no agency providing food services, pursuant to this chapter shall be prohibited from serving meals consistent with terms and conditions in its contract, to individuals as long as the total number of meals served by all agencies within the region, as established by the State Department of Aging, does not exceed the number of meals authorized by the State Department of Aging to be served for such region.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

18327.4.

Notwithstanding any other law, meals served or provided to be consumed outside of an in-person setting or a virtual congregate setting may be provided under the Home Delivered Nutrition Services program established pursuant to Subpart II (commencing with Section 3030f) of Part C of Subchapter III of Chapter 35 of Title 42 of the United States Code. Meals that are served or provided as described in this section shall comply with the federal requirements governing that program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 302, Sec. 2.   (AB 1476)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18329.

To the extent permitted by federal law, benefits received under this chapter shall not be treated as income or resources for the purpose of any program or provision of Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

18330.

In each case where the Director of the State Department of Aging determines that the failure or inability of any contractor adequately to perform the terms of a contract for a nutrition project established pursuant to this chapter requires the suspension, termination or withholding of funding for that project in accordance with applicable law, the State Department of Aging may provide on a purchase-of-service basis the services which otherwise would have been provided by that project for a period not to exceed 60 consecutive days where necessary to avoid interruption of provision of nutrition services to eligible individuals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

18331.

There is hereby established a Nutrition Reserve Fund under the control of the Director of the Department of Aging. From the fund the director may allocate to any individual nutrition project for any fiscal year no more than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) in order to maintain necessary services which lack sufficient federal funding.

A nutrition project shall not receive more than one appropriation from the Nutrition Reserve Fund during the duration of the contract period of the project. 

Requests for allocations from the Nutrition Reserve Fund shall be reviewed by the applicable local area agency on aging. The local area agency on aging shall submit recommendations to the California Department of Aging.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 713, Sec. 59.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

18331.1.

Notwithstanding the limitations of Section 18331 of this code, the director is empowered to allocate money from the Nutrition Reserve Fund in order to implement the Nutrition and Volunteer Services Program for Senior Citizens for the calendar year commencing January 1, 1981.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1292, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

18332.

(a) All allocations from the Nutrition Reserve Fund shall be approved by the Director of Finance prior to issuance.

(b) The funds shall be used to maintain existing nutrition services when it is determined that no federal funds are available for this purpose. To the extent funds are available in the initial appropriation under Chapter 1189 of the Statutes of 1979, Nutrition Reserve Fund moneys may be used for increased cost per meal resulting from inflation and increased number of participants in existing projects resulting from the fact that inflation is causing more seniors on fixed incomes to fall below the poverty level.

(c) When appropriated by the Legislature, the Nutrition Reserve Fund, not to exceed an aggregate total of one million dollars ($1,000,000), may be used to extend or implement innovative nutrition demonstration projects.

(d) In addition, one million dollars ($1,000,000) of the fund shall constitute a revolving loan account from which the Department of Aging may extend loans, without interest, not to exceed three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) per loan to be repaid from yearend balances in any senior nutrition project.

(e) In order to qualify for funds from the Nutrition Reserve Fund a nutrition project shall be required to seek from the community in which it is located, a matching grant in the amount equal to 5 percent of the requested allocation. The matching grant may be in the form of in-kind services, unless these services are presently being used as the basis for a matching grant for the project. In addition, if all other alternatives are exhausted to meet the 5-percent federal matching requirement required in PL 95-478, the Department of Aging may allocate funds from the Nutrition Reserve Fund as are necessary to meet this 5-percent match requirement. These funds may be used to maintain existing services, one-time major expenditures or to expand services to fulfill unmet needs. Thirty days prior to allocating funds from the Nutrition Reserve Fund for the purpose of meeting the 5-percent federal matching requirement, the Department of Aging shall advise the Assembly Committee on Aging, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal committees in both houses of its plan for these allocations.

(f) When a nutrition project receives an allocation of funds from the Nutrition Reserve Fund due to the presence of fiscal difficulties, the Department of Aging shall, in conjunction with the applicable local area agency on aging and the nutrition project receiving these funds, take immediate action to determine the reason for the project’s fiscal difficulties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 713, Sec. 60.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

18333.

(a) The Nutrition Reserve Fund shall also be used for the purpose of making loans to maintain existing levels of supportive services provided pursuant to Section 3030d of Title 42 of the United States Code, in order to compensate for cuts in federal funds for those services for the 1989–90 state fiscal year. 

(b) The loans shall be repaid with one-time-only funds as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 9315, or with federal funds received in the fourth quarter of the 1989–90 federal fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 105, Sec. 1.   Effective May 23, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

18335.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(a) Retired firemen may be utilized to conduct fire inspections of the sites of nutrition projects for senior citizens in order to determine whether such sites are in compliance with state and local fire safety standards.

(b) Retired licensed sanitarians may be utilized to conduct sanitation inspections of sites of nutrition projects for senior citizens in order to determine whether such sites are in compliance with applicable state and local sanitation standards.

Such retirees may contract with local area agencies on aging or nutrition projects to perform the required inspections as independent contractors. Fees for the undertaking of such inspections shall be paid out of federal funds allocated to local area agencies on aging which are provided by Title III of the Older Americans Act.

A written report of the findings of such fire safety and sanitation inspections shall be furnished to the appropriate area agency on aging or the director of the nutrition project in which sites inspected are located.

A report of uncorrected fire safety deficiencies, after a followup inspection, shall be supplied or mailed to the local fire protection agency.

A report of uncorrected sanitation deficiencies, after a followup inspection, shall be supplied or mailed to the local health agency.

It is the intent of this section that inspections carried out pursuant hereto shall satisfy federal regulations which provide that sites for nutrition projects for senior citizens must meet applicable state and local fire sanitation standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 355, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.2. Intensive Foster Care Programs [18358. - 18358.38.]

18358.

The definitions contained in this section shall govern the construction of this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

(a) “Department” means the State Department of Social Services.

(b) “Eligible children” means children who meet both of the following conditions:

(1) Children who are emotionally disturbed, or who have a serious behavioral problem, as evidenced by a history that may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) Lying.

(B) Stealing.

(C) Verbal or physical aggression.

(D) Unacceptable sexual behavior.

(E) Attempts at self-harmful behaviors.

(F) Defiant and oppositional behavior.

(2) Children who, as a result of their emotional disturbance or serious behavioral problem, satisfy one or more of the following criteria:

(A) Are placed in a group home with a rate classification level of nine or higher pursuant to Section 11462.

(B) Have been assessed by the child’s county interagency review team or county placing agency as at imminent risk of psychiatric hospitalization or placement in a group home with a rate classification level of nine or higher pursuant to Section 11462.

(C) Were previously in a group home program, except children on probation or otherwise in the custody of the juvenile court for any violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code.

(D) Are voluntarily placed in a group home with a rate classification level of 9 or higher pursuant to Section 7572.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 486, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on or after July 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 18358.38.   Repealed as of January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18358.05.

(a) The department shall implement intensive treatment foster care programs for eligible children.

(b) (1) The department shall implement the program in any participating county that applies for and receives the department’s approval for an intensive treatment foster care program rate.

(2) Upon application to the department, the county shall do all of the following:

(A) Identify the population of children to be served, including, but not limited to, the rate classification levels from 9 to 14, inclusive, pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 18358, that the county has chosen to include.

(B) Certify that participating foster family agencies have the required personnel, administrative support, financial services, and resources to successfully participate in the program.

(C) Project savings or cost neutrality to the state General Fund.

(D) Provide a plan for monitoring the participating foster family agencies for compliance with this chapter.

(3) Each participating foster family agency may, with the approval of the host county, accept placements from counties other than the host county.

(c) No more than a total of 1,000 children who were in, or at imminent risk of being placed in, group homes with rate classification levels of 9 to 11, inclusive, pursuant to Section 11462, may be placed in intensive treatment foster care programs at the same time, from January 1, 2009, to December 31, 2011, inclusive. This limitation does not include children in the Title IV-E waiver demonstration project Counties of Alameda and Los Angeles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 486, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on or after July 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 18358.38.   Repealed as of January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18358.10.

Each foster family agency participating in this program shall enter into a contract or memorandum of understanding with the county and provide all of the following personnel and administrative and support services:

(a) (1) Special attention to the selection and training of foster parents.

(2) All participating intensive treatment foster care (ITFC) foster parents shall be provided with at least 40 hours of training in the care of emotionally disturbed children or children who have a serious behavioral problem before becoming an ITFC parent, and before placement of a child pursuant to this program, 32 hours of ongoing
 in-service training within the first 12 months after becoming a certified ITFC parent, and 12 hours of ongoing in-service training each year thereafter. Training shall include, but not be limited to, working with abused and neglected children, behavior de-escalation techniques, and cardiopulmonary resuscitation and first aid. All training shall be completed prior to the child’s placement in the home. In two-parent homes, placement may be made after one parent has completed 40 hours of training, provided that an additional 20 hours of ongoing in-service training are completed within 12 months after becoming an ITFC foster parent, and provided that the second parent has completed 40 hours of training and completes an additional 20 hours of training within the first six months of certification of the foster parent as an ITFC foster parent.

(3) Upon approval of the county interagency review team or the county placing agency, the training requirements specified in paragraph (2) for a participating foster parent in this program may be waived for foster parents with prior experience that includes, but is not limited to, working for at least one year with emotionally disturbed children or children who have a serious behavioral problem.

(4) Foster parents shall be provided with all necessary support services.

(b) Caseloads for participating social work case managers that average eight children, except as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 18358.30.

(c) The specific assignment to each certified family home of a trained
 support counselor with experience in residential treatment.

(1) The support counselor shall have one of the following:

(A) A bachelor’s degree in a social science related field and at least six months of experience in working with emotionally disturbed children or children who have a serious behavioral problem.

(B) An associate degree in a social science related field and have at least one year’s experience in working with emotionally disturbed children or children who have a serious behavioral problem.

(C) Upon approval of the county interagency review team or the county placing agency, the educational requirements may be waived for support counselors with
 at least two years of experience working with emotionally disturbed children or children who have a serious behavioral problem, and who demonstrate a combination of education, skills, and experience that meets the specific cultural and linguistic needs of the target population.

(2) Each participating foster family agency shall provide each support counselor with 40 hours of training to include, but not be limited to, working with abused and neglected children, behavior
 de-escalation techniques, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, first aid, and developing treatment plans for emotionally disturbed children or children who have a serious behavioral problem. All training shall be completed prior to placing a child in a certified family home for which the support counselor is assigned responsibility. An additional 20 hours of ongoing in-service training is required within the first 12 months after becoming an ITFC support counselor.

(3) Each support counselor shall provide support service to the child and the foster family. This service shall include, but not be limited to, structuring a safe environment for the child, collateral contacts, and any administrative or training functions necessary to implement the child’s needs and services plan. The child’s needs and services plan shall ensure that
 services meet the child’s needs and are appropriate to and consistent with the minimum level of service specified in Section 18358.30. The child’s individual needs and services plan shall be reviewed and approved by the certified foster parents.

(d) Coordination services with local education agencies and the service provider’s nonpublic school, where applicable.

(e) A 24-hour on call administrator who is available to respond to emergency situations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 79.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative on or after July 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 18358.38.    Repealed as of January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18358.15.

(a) Each foster family agency participating in the program shall develop the child’s needs and services plan, and have it agreed to by the county interagency review team, or county placing agency, and certified foster parents. Each foster family agency participating in the program shall provide the services and supports identified in the needs and services plan which are allowable under California’s foster care program in accordance with Sections 11460 and 11463, and their implementing regulations. Each foster family agency shall also arrange for the services needed by each child and for which the child meets eligibility criteria under applicable publicly funded programs, including, but not limited to, mental health, education, and health services. The foster family agency shall
 arrange for these services funded by those publicly funded programs to be delivered either by the private nonprofit organization that also operates the foster family agency or by another qualified provider. Children in the ITFC program who meet the public mental health system criteria for mental health services and supports shall have those services and supports funded by the Early Periodic Screening, Diagnosis, and Treatment (EPSDT) program pursuant to Section 14718 and other appropriate mental health system sources. This subdivision shall not be construed to change the eligibility criteria for EPSDT benefits or services pursuant to federal law. The services that the foster family agency shall provide or arrange for include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Individualized needs and services plans that ensure continuity and stability in the placement of participating children in certified family homes that meet the needs of eligible children, including children making the transition from institutional placement to noninstitutional placement. The needs and services plan for each child in placement shall describe the specific needs of the child and the appropriate level of services provided to the child pursuant to Section 18358.30.

(2) Education and mental health services for children.

(3) In-home and support services necessary to implement the case plan.

(4) Other necessary services for children in placement, including medical and dental services.

(b) No more than one emotionally disturbed
 child or child who has a serious behavioral problem shall be placed in a certified ITFC family home unless the participating foster family agency provides the placing or participating county welfare department with a written assessment of the risk and compatibility of placing together two children who are emotionally disturbed or have a serious behavioral problem. More than two children who are emotionally disturbed or have serious behavioral problems who are siblings may be placed together in the same certified family home if the placement is approved by the county interagency review team or the county placing agency of the participating county. However, there shall be no more than a total of five children living in a certified family home with two adults, and there shall be no more than a total of three children living in a certified family home with one adult, except in cases where children living in the home other than those placed pursuant to this chapter are 15 years of age or older.

(c) Any use of physical contact to manage the behavior of a child that is reported to the foster family agency pursuant to Section 18538.25 shall in turn be reported by the foster family agency to the Community Care Licensing Division of the department as a special incident pursuant to Section 80061 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 249.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 254 of Ch. 34.   Conditionally inoperative on or after July 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 18358.38.   Repealed as of January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18358.20.

In addition to the requirements of Sections 18358.10 and 18358.15, any foster family agency that serves children under this program shall have a contract or memorandum of understanding with the county prior to accepting referrals of children. The contract or memorandum of understanding shall identify how the foster family agency will provide or arrange for the following services and activities:

(a) An effective 24 hours a day, seven days a week social work emergency response service. The plan shall include the criteria for an in-person response and define the timeframe in which in-person response will be made.

(b) Mental health coverage
 available as needed for mental health emergencies.

(c) Development of a service plan approved by the placing county for each child within one month of placement that thoroughly assesses the unique needs and strengths of the child in the life domains specified in paragraph (1), and identifies the necessary services and supports to improve outcomes.

(1) For purposes of this section, “life domains” means the framework of important aspects of a child’s life to be assessed in the child’s service plan, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Safety.

(B) Emotional and psychological well-being.

(C) Behavioral.

(D) Family and living situation.

(E) Social and recreational.

(F) Cultural and spiritual.

(G) Educational and vocational.

(H) Health.

(I) Developmental.

(2) Applicable services and supports associated with each life domain, which may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(A) The child’s need for mental health service interventions.

(B) Individual or group mental health treatment services.

(C) Psychotropic medication and monitoring.

(D) Behavior analysis, positive behavioral interventions, and behavioral modification techniques.

(E) Interventions designed to prevent entry or reentry into the juvenile justice system.

(F) Family reunification services, parent training, or other support services needed to return the child home, or when that is not possible, to establish, reestablish, or reinforce a lifelong relationship with a caring adult.

(G) Family finding services to support and enhance access to lifelong
 permanent relationships with relative and nonrelative kin.

(H) Targeted life skills training and resources to ensure appropriate access to social and recreational resources and relationships, as needed to support the achievement of important developmental milestones.

(I) Mentoring or developing of positive adult relationships.

(J) Education supports, as needed to maintain and enhance the child’s educational success and stability.

(K) Education liaison services as needed to support the child’s education in the least restrictive environment.

(L) Respite care.

(M) Support counselors.

(N) Case management to ensure appropriate and effective coordination of activities and resources as identified in the needs and services plan.

(d) A system for recruiting, training, and supervising qualified in-home support counselors.

(e) A system of record keeping that documents the delivery of services and supports to each child. This documentation shall be summarized and submitted on an annual basis to the county. Each agency shall report the type and cost of the services delivered.

(f) Written policies and procedures on how the program will be structured to ensure the safety of the child, how suicide attempts, runaways,
 sexual acting out or, violent and assaultive behavior will be handled, and what will occur to reduce or eliminate future episodes.

(g) Written procedures on frequency of treatment plan review, modifications of treatment plans, and the role of the foster family and the child’s parents in development of the treatment plan.

(h) A process for recruitment, selection and training of foster parents, including respite foster parents. The training curriculum shall include the following areas, at a minimum:

(1) Alternative forms of discipline.

(2) Child growth and development.

(3) Behavior management
 techniques.

(4) Differential needs and treatment of children.

(5) Behavior de-escalation techniques.

(i) Arranging for the provision of respite care services and frequency of respite care.

(j) Social work staffing. Social workers shall have a master’s degree consistent with subdivision (e) of Section 1506 of the Health and Safety Code, and shall have at least one year of experience working with seriously emotionally disturbed children or children who have a serious behavioral problem.

(k) Other staff or contract services to be utilized in service delivery, the tasks and responsibilities of those
 individuals, and the training they will receive.

(l) An evaluation component that includes quarterly reporting to the department of the following data, by age group. The department shall publish the data annually.

(1) Number of children placed under this chapter.

(2) Number of prior foster care placements for each child prior to entering the ITFC program.

(3) Outcomes for children referred to the program, including:

(A) Percentage of children discharged to a more intensive program.

(B) Percentage of children discharged to a less
 restrictive program, short of permanency.

(C) Percentage of children who drop down an ITFC level.

(D) Percentage of children discharged to reunification with a parent or guardian.

(E) Percentage of children discharged to adoption.

(F) Percentage of children discharged to kin guardianship.

(G) Percentage of children discharged to other permanent outcome.

(H) Percentage of children hospitalized.

(I) Number of ITFC families in which a child was placed.

(J) Percentage of children continuing in placement.

(m) A plan for surveying placing counties annually to ascertain and report to the department on the following:

(1) Quality of services provided.

(2) Progress toward treatment goals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 80.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative on or after July 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 18358.38.    Repealed as of January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18358.23.

In addition to the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 18358.05, participating counties shall do all of the following:

(a) Determine the placement of eligible children in intensive treatment foster care programs. All children placed in the programs shall either have a completed level of care assessment indicating a need for services greater than regular foster care or have their placement reviewed by the participating county’s existing interagency review team or county placing agency.

(b) Enter into contracts or memoranda of understanding with participating foster family agencies.

(c) Provide routine case management services.

(d) Monitor the implementation of the case plan for the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 486, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on or after July 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 18358.38.   Repealed as of January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18358.25.

(a) Certified foster parents participating under this chapter shall ensure the well-being of emotionally disturbed children or children with a serious behavioral problem under their care. This care includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Participation in initial and ongoing in-service training and demonstration pursuant to Section 18358.1 and demonstration of an understanding of and ability to meet the needs of emotionally disturbed children or children with a serious behavioral problem.

(2) Participation in the implementation of the individual case plan and in the development and implementation of the needs and services plan for the child.

(3) Ensuring that the child’s medical and dental needs are met.

(b) To the extent possible, certified foster parents selected under this chapter shall have a background in special education, psychological counseling, nursing, or child development.

(c) (1) All certified foster parents selected to participate in this program shall rent, lease, or own their own homes which shall be certified by the foster family agency.

(2) The home of certified foster parents shall be within reasonably close proximity to the participating foster family agency or a satellite location of the agency, and to the extent possible, close to the child’s family and community.

(d) (1) All certified foster parents shall report any special incident pursuant to Section 80061 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations. Additionally, any use of physical contact to manage the behavior of a child shall be reported as a special incident.

(2) Certified foster parents shall report incidents to the participating foster family agency, which shall report the incidents to the Community Care Licensing Division of the department pursuant to Section 18358.15.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 486, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on or after July 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 18358.38.   Repealed as of January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18358.30.

(a) Rates for foster family agency programs participating under this chapter shall be exempt from the current AFDC-FC foster family agency ratesetting system.

(b) Rates for foster family agency programs participating under this chapter shall be set according to the appropriate service and rate level based on the level of services provided to the eligible child and the certified foster family. For an eligible child placed from a group home program, the service and rate level shall not exceed the rate paid for group home placement. For an eligible child assessed by the county interagency review team or county placing agency as at imminent risk of group home placement or psychiatric
 hospitalization, the appropriate service and rate level for the child shall be determined by the interagency review team or county placing agency at time of placement. In all of the service and rate levels, the foster family agency programs shall:
